Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.170

Information from municipal associations.

It shall be the duty of each association of municipal corporations or municipal officers, which is recognized by law and utilized as an official agency for the coordination of the policies and/or administrative programs of municipal corporations, to submit biennially, or oftener as necessary, to the governor and to the legislature the joint recommendations of such participating municipalities regarding changes which would affect the efficiency of such municipal corporations. Such associations shall include but shall not be limited to the Washington state association of fire commissioners and the Washington state school directors' association.

[ 2007 c 31 s 7; 1999 c 153 s 59; 1970 ex.s. c 69 s 2.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—1999 c 153: See note following RCW 57.04.050.

Purpose—1970 ex.s. c 69: "It is the purpose of this act to assist the legislature in obtaining adequate information as to the needs of its municipal corporations and other public agencies and their recommendations for improvements." [ 1970 ex.s. c 69 s 1.]

Intent—Construction—1970 ex.s. c 69: "The intent of this act is to clarify and implement the powers of the public agencies to which it relates and nothing herein shall be construed to impair or limit the existing powers of any municipal corporation or association." [ 1970 ex.s. c 69 s 3.]